Illinois, session 104th, SB3468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Director of Corrections, on behalf of the 5State of Illinois and the Department of Corrections, is 6authorized to convey by quitclaim deed all right, title, and 7interest of the State of Illinois and the Department of 8Corrections in and to the real property and buildings of the 9former Tamms Correctional Center to Alexander County, subject 10to the conditions and restrictions described in Section 10. 11    Section 10. Conveyance of the property shall be in an "as 12is" condition, and Alexander County shall pay all required 13costs and expenses for the conveyance, as determined by the 14Director of Corrections. Alexander County is authorized to 15lease the property for a public purpose of health. The 16quitclaim deed shall state on its face and be subject to the 17condition that if the property is no longer used for that 18public purpose, then title shall revert without further action 19to the State of Illinois. 20    Section 20. The Director of Corrections shall obtain a 21certified copy of this Act from the Secretary of State within 2260 days after its effective date and, upon the conveyance of   SB3468- 2 -LRB104 19048 JRC 32493 b1the property described in Section 5 being made, shall cause 2the certified copy of this Act to be recorded in the office of 3the Recorder of Alexander County.